Utah statutes.
13-42-105.    Application for registration -- Form, fee, and accompanying documents.

(1)  An application for registration as a provider shall be in a form prescribed by the administrator.

(2)  Subject to adjustment of dollar amounts pursuant to Subsection 13-42-132(6), an application for registration as a provider shall be accompanied by:

(a)  the fee established by the administrator in accordance with Section 63J-1-504;

(b)  the bond required by Section 13-42-113;

(c)  identification of all trust accounts required by Section 13-42-122 and an irrevocable consent authorizing the administrator to review and examine the trust accounts;

(d)  evidence of insurance in the amount of $250,000:

(i)  against the risks of dishonesty, fraud, theft, and other misconduct on the part of the applicant or a director, employee, or agent of the applicant;

(ii)  issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least A or equivalent by a nationally recognized rating organization approved by the administrator;

(iii)  with a deductible not exceeding $5,000;

(iv)  payable for the benefit of the applicant, this state, and individuals who are residents of this state, as their interests may appear; and

(v)  not subject to cancellation by the applicant or the insurer until 60 days after written notice has been given to the administrator;

(e)  a record consenting to the jurisdiction of this state containing:

(i)  the name, business address, and other contact information of its registered agent in this state for purposes of service of process; or

(ii)  the appointment of the administrator as agent of the provider for purposes of service of process; and

(f)  if the applicant is organized as a not-for-profit entity or is exempt from taxation, evidence of not-for-profit and tax-exempt status applicable to the applicant under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. Section 501.

(3) (a)  The administrator may waive or reduce the insurance requirement in Subsection 13-42-105(2)(d) if the provider does not:

(i)  maintain control of a trust account or receive money paid by an individual pursuant to a plan for distribution to creditors;

(ii)  make payments to creditors on behalf of individuals;

(iii)  collect fees by means of automatic payment from individuals; and

(iv)  execute any powers of attorney that may be utilized by the provider to collect fees from or expend funds on behalf of an individual.

(b)  A waiver or reduction in insurance requirements allowed by the administrator under Subsection (3)(a) shall balance the reduction in risk posed by a provider meeting the stated requirements against any continued need for insurance against employee and director dishonesty.

